Utah statutes.
53A-1a-902.   Voluntary extended-day kindergarten program.

(1)  If funds are appropriated for this purpose, the State Board of Education shall allocate available funds, consistent with Section 53A-1a-903, to charter schools and school districts that apply to offer extended-day kindergarten.

(2)  A school district shall coordinate program application, funding, administration, and reporting for its schools that participate in the program.

(3)  A charter school or school district:

(a)  may not require a student to participate in extended-day kindergarten;

(b)  shall continue to offer part-day kindergarten for students not participating in the program; and

(c)  shall continue to honor the provisions of any preexisting contractual agreement related to other early intervention programs offered at the school site, through the remaining term of the contract.

(4)  A charter school or school district that receives funds under this part shall:

(a)  annually conduct a kindergarten readiness assessment for incoming kindergarten students prior to the beginning of the school year;

(b)  ensure that:

(i)  a majority of students enrolled in an extended-day kindergarten class under this part are students who have the greatest need for additional instruction, as determined by the kindergarten readiness assessment; and

(ii)  an extended-day kindergarten class does not have more enrolled students than other kindergarten classes in the school;

(c)  utilize allocated funds to establish extended-day kindergarten in the schools with greatest need as measured by the percentage of students eligible for free lunch; and

(d)  annually report to the State Board of Education regarding:

(i)  the number of students served;

(ii)  the specific results achieved by the program, including any standardized testing or district-directed assessment;

(iii)  challenges encountered in administering the program and suggestions for improvement; and

(iv)  specific accountability for and tracking of the voluntary extended-day kindergarten program dollars each year.

(5)  Until 2012, the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report to the Education Interim Committee on the program, including a summary of information reported under Subsection (4)(d).

(6)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and consistent with this part, the State Board of Education shall make rules establishing application and reporting procedures necessary to administer this part.

